Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.430

Head injury prevention—Guidelines on training and education—Training of emergency medical personnel.

The department shall prepare guidelines on relevant training and education regarding traumatic brain injury for health and education professionals, and relevant public safety and law enforcement officials. The department shall distribute such guidelines and any recommendations for training or educational requirements for health professionals or educators to the disciplinary authorities governed by chapter 18.130 RCW and to educational service districts established under chapter 28A.310 RCW. Specifically, all emergency medical personnel shall be trained in proper helmet removal.

[ 1990 c 270 s 6.]